Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 42 Education of Gifted Children
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-42-1.
Establishment of program for gifted and talented children.

In any city or town where there is a child eligible to attend elementary or secondary schools who is either gifted or talented to an extent that a standard educational program would not foster potential development, the school committee of the city or town may provide the type of educational program that will satisfy the needs of the gifted or talented child in grades pre-kindergarten through twelve (12), the program to be approved by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education.

Providing programs and services for gifted and talented elementary or secondary level students:

Requires an educational program and/or service which is different from that normally provided in the standard school program and which is educationally, personally, and socially beneficial; and

Requires that programs developed serve students who demonstrate unique talents and/or superior capabilities in areas such as specific academic aptitude, creative thinking, intelligence, visual, performing and industrial arts, and leadership.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 95, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 142, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 205, art. 14, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 344, art. 13, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 307, § 1.

16-42-2.
Regulations of the board of regents.

It shall be the duty of the board of regents for elementary and secondary education to establish regulations for the purpose of carrying out the intent of this chapter; these regulations shall include:

Criteria for the identification of gifted and talented students in the categories in §

16-42-1

.

Criteria for education programming for each category of gifted and talented.

Criteria for monitoring and evaluating of educational programs.

Definitions of responsibilities of local school committees and the department of elementary and secondary education.

Other rules and regulations for the purpose of carrying out the intent of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 95, § 2; P.L. 1978, ch. 142, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 205, art. 14, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 344, art. 13, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 307, § 1.

16-42-3.
State advisory committee.

A state advisory committee shall be established by the department of elementary and secondary education. The committee shall be comprised of not less than fifteen (15) members: one of whom shall be the chairperson of the house finance committee or designee; one of whom shall be the chairperson of the senate finance committee or designee; one of whom shall be representative of the Rhode Island association of school superintendents; two (2) of whom shall be representatives of the Rhode Island association of school principals; two (2) of whom shall be school teachers; one of whom shall be representative of the state council on the arts; one of whom shall be a representative of a gifted project; two (2) of whom shall be educator representatives of higher education; one of whom shall be representative of the Rhode Island association of school committees; two (2) of whom shall be representatives of the public who shall be parents; and one of whom shall be representative of business/industry.

In appointing members to the state advisory committee, the commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall ensure equal access and opportunity for participation to all interested parties. Members of the state advisory committee shall serve without compensation and shall meet a minimum of four (4) times a year. The advisory committee shall advise the commissioner of elementary and secondary education on all matters pertaining to the education of gifted and talented students.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 167, art. 7, § 4; P.L. 1995, ch. 307, § 1.

16-42-4 — 16-42-11.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 95, §§ 3-9, 11, 12; Repealed by P.L. 1978, ch. 142, § 2; P.L. 1978, ch. 205, art. 14, § 2. For present provisions see §§

16-42-1

,

16-42-2

.